Utah statutes.
54-1-12.   Deposit of funds.

All money collected by the commission under any provision of this title shall be deposited without deduction in the state treasury on or before the 15th day of each month next succeeding the month in which the same was received, accompanied by a statement showing the date received.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2013 General Session

